Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.225

Prohibitions on offer, sale, or purchase of securities.

In the offer, sale, or purchase of securities issued incident to its conversion, no savings bank, or any director, officer, attorney, agent, or employee thereof, may (1) employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud, or (2) obtain money or property by means of any untrue statement of a material fact or any omission to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or (3) engage in any act, transaction, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon a purchaser or seller.

[ 1981 c 85 s 44.]